Illinois, session 104th, SB2012.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. If and only if Senate Bill 867 of the 103rd 5General Assembly becomes law, then the State Parks Act is 6amended by changing Section 3b as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 835/3b)8    Sec. 3b. Shabbona Lake and State Park; land management 9agreement.10    (a) The Department of Natural Resources may enter into a 11land management agreement with the Prairie Band Potawatomi 12Nation and other necessary parties for the purpose of 13managing, maintaining, or operating the real property conveyed 14to the Prairie Band Potawatomi Nation by this amendatory Act 15of the 103rd General Assembly. Any such agreement shall 16contain the purpose, powers, rights, objectives, and 17responsibilities of each contracting party; restrictions on 18gaming operations; and a requirement that the land conveyed by 19this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly remain open 20for public recreation during the term of any such agreement. 21All agreements entered into pursuant to this Section shall be 22subject to the written approval of the Director of Natural 23Resources.  SB2012- 2 -LRB104 11870 HLH 21960 b1    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Department of Natural 2Resources may use State resources for the management, 3maintenance, and operation of the real property conveyed to 4the Prairie Band Potawatomi Nation by this amendatory Act in 5accordance with the land management agreement that it executes 6with the Prairie Band Potawatomi Nation under this Section.7    (c) In this Section, "land management agreement" means one 8or more agreements, or set of agreements, made for the purpose 9of managing, maintaining, or operating the real property 10conveyed to the Prairie Band Potawatomi Nation by this 11amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly.12(Source: 10300SB0867enr.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law or on the date Senate Bill 867 of the 103rd 15General Assembly takes effect, whichever is later.